New York, session 2025-2026, A10023.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 191-d to 2 read as follows: 3 § 191-d. Non-compete agreements. 1. For the purposes of this section, 4 the term: 5 (a) "non-compete agreement" means any agreement, or clause contained 6 in any agreement, between an employer and a covered individual that 7 prohibits or restricts such covered individual from obtaining employ- 8 ment, after the conclusion of employment with the employer included as a 9 party to the agreement; 10 (b) "covered individual" means any person other than a highly compen- 11 sated individual who, whether or not employed under a contract of 12 employment, performs or has performed work or services for another 13 person on such terms and conditions that they are, in relation to that 14 other person, in a position of economic dependence on, and under an 15 obligation to perform duties for, that other person; 16 (c) "highly compensated individual" means any individual who is 17 compensated at an average annualized rate of cash compensation deter- 18 mined by the income listed on the individual's three most recent W-2 19 statements and, where applicable, K-1 statements, or all such statements 20 from the duration of the individual's employment if the term of employ- 21 ment is less than three years, equivalent to or greater than five 22 hundred thousand dollars per year, provided that such compensation level 23 shall be adjusted each calendar year, beginning in two thousand twenty- 24 seven, based on the increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for 25 all Urban Consumers for New York state, with the base year of two thou- 26 sand twenty-six; and 27 (d) "health related professional" means a physician licensed pursuant 28 to article one hundred thirty-one of the education law, a physician EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09274-03-5 A. 10023 2 1 assistant licensed pursuant to article one hundred thirty-one-B of the 2 education law, a chiropractor licensed pursuant to article one hundred 3 thirty-two of the education law, a dentist licensed pursuant to article 4 one hundred thirty-three of the education law, a perfusionist licensed 5 pursuant to article one hundred thirty-four of the education law, a 6 veterinarian licensed pursuant to article one hundred thirty-five of the 7 education law, a physical therapist licensed pursuant to article one 8 hundred thirty-six of the education law, a pharmacist licensed pursuant 9 to article one hundred thirty-seven of the education law, a nurse 10 licensed pursuant to article one hundred thirty-nine of the education 11 law, a podiatrist licensed pursuant to article one hundred forty-one of 12 the education law, an optometrist licensed pursuant to article one 13 hundred forty-three of the education law, a psychologist licensed pursu- 14 ant to article one hundred fifty-three of the education law, an occupa- 15 tional therapist licensed pursuant to article one hundred fifty-six of 16 the education law, a speech pathologist or audiologist licensed pursuant 17 to article one hundred fifty-nine of the education law, or a mental 18 health practitioner licensed pursuant to article one hundred sixty-three 19 of the education law. 20 2. No employer or its agent, or the officer or agent of any corpo- 21 ration, partnership, limited liability company, not-for-profit corpo- 22 ration or association or other entity, shall seek, require, demand or 23 accept a non-compete agreement from any covered individual or health 24 related professional. Any non-compete agreement sought, required, 25 demanded or accepted after the effective date of this section shall be 26 null, void, and unenforceable. 27 3. (a) A covered individual, may bring a civil action in a court of 28 competent jurisdiction against any employer or persons alleged to have 29 violated this section. A covered individual shall bring such action 30 within two years of the later of: (i) when the prohibited non-compete 31 agreement was signed; (ii) when the covered individual learns of the 32 prohibited non-compete agreement; (iii) when the employment or contrac- 33 tual relationship is terminated; or (iv) when the employer takes any 34 step to enforce the non-compete agreement. The court shall have juris- 35 diction to void any such non-compete agreement and to order all appro- 36 priate relief, including enjoining the conduct of any person or employ- 37 er; ordering payment of liquidated damages; and awarding lost 38 compensation, compensatory damages, reasonable attorneys' fees and costs 39 to the covered individual or health related professional. 40 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, liquidated damages shall be 41 calculated as an amount not more than ten thousand dollars per covered 42 individual or health related professional. The court shall award liqui- 43 dated damages to every covered individual affected under this section, 44 in addition to any other remedies permitted by this section. 45 4. Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted as limit- 46 ing the protections of individuals under any other provision of federal, 47 state, or local law, rule, or regulation relating to the ability of an 48 employer to enter into an agreement with a prospective or current 49 covered individual or health related professional that: (a) establishes 50 a fixed term of service and/or exclusivity during employment; (b) 51 prohibits disclosure of trade secrets; (c) prohibits disclosure of 52 confidential and proprietary client information; or (d) prohibits solic- 53 itation of clients of the employer; provided that such agreements do not 54 otherwise restrict competition in violation of this section. 55 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to amend, modify, 56 impair, or otherwise affect the application of enforcement of section A. 10023 3 1 two hundred two-k of this chapter, nor shall it be interpreted to create 2 any conflict or inconsistency with such provision. 3 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contra- 4 ry, nothing in this section shall prohibit the inclusion and enforcement 5 of non-compete agreements or other similar covenants in the sale of the 6 goodwill of a business or the sale or disposition of a majority of an 7 ownership interest in a business by a partner of a partnership, a member 8 of a limited liability company, or an entity for: 9 (a) any such partner of a partnership or member of a limited liability 10 company owning at least a fifteen percent interest in such partnership 11 or limited liability company; or 12 (b) any such person or entity owning fifteen percent or more ownership 13 interest in a business. 14 7. Any non-compete agreement that is permissible or enforceable under 15 this section shall: 16 (a) meet all requirements for determining enforceability under the 17 common law of New York, including but not limited to: (i) it is reason- 18 able in time, geography, and scope; (ii) it does not impose an undue 19 hardship on the employee; (iii) it does not harm the public; (iv) it is 20 necessary to protect the employer's legitimate business interests; and 21 (v) its restrictions are no greater than necessary to protect the legit- 22 imate business interests of the employer. A non-compete agreement that 23 is reasonable in time pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph 24 shall not contain a term of restriction greater than one year; and 25 (b) provide for the payment of salary during the period of enforcement 26 of the non-compete agreement. 27 8. No choice of law provision or choice of venue provision that would 28 have the effect of avoiding or limiting the requirements of this section 29 shall be enforceable if the covered individual is and has been, for at 30 least thirty days immediately preceding the covered individual's cessa- 31 tion of employment, a resident of New York or employed in New York, 32 including individuals who work remotely in another state but who report 33 to a New York worksite or office or who report to a New York-based 34 supervisor. 35 9. Every employer shall inform their employees of their protections 36 and rights under this section by posting a notice thereof pursuant to 37 section forty-five of this chapter. Such notice shall be posted conspic- 38 uously in easily accessible and well-lighted places customarily 39 frequented by employees and applicants for employment. 40 § 2. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 45 to read as 41 follows: 42 § 45. Notice to employees related to non-compete agreements. The 43 department shall be tasked with developing a notice to inform employees 44 of their protections and rights pursuant to section one hundred ninety- 45 one-d of this chapter. Such notice shall be provided to employers for 46 distribution to employees and posted on the department's website. 47 § 3. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 48 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 49 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 50 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 51 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 52 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 53 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 54 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 55 invalid provisions had not been included herein. A. 10023 4 1 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 2 have become a law and shall be applicable to contracts entered into or 3 modified on or after such effective date and shall have no retroactive 4 effect; provided, however, that section two of this act shall take 5 effect on the one hundred eightieth day after it shall have become a 6 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment, and/or repeal of 7 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 8 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 9 such effective date.